Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5116XC (4) 91 je/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 261M.1 Definition. 1 As used in this chapter, âinstitution of higher educationâ 2 means an institution of higher learning governed by the state 3 board of regents. âInstitution of higher educationâ also 4 includes an accredited private institution as defined in 5 section 256.183 with respect to students who are awarded a 6 tuition grant as defined in section 256.183. 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261M.2 Career development meeting for 8 newly enrolled students. 9 1. An institution of higher education shall require each 10 enrolled undergraduate student, in their first semester or term 11 of enrollment or during new student orientation, to schedule 12 and attend a meeting with the institutionâs career development 13 office or similar unit of the institution. The meeting must 14 include but is not limited to all of the following: 15 a. A review of the studentâs work history, if applicable. 16 b. A review of the studentâs areas of interest. 17 c. If the student has not declared a major, a review of 18 possible career paths based on the studentâs areas of interest. 19 d. If the student has declared a major, a review of possible 20 career paths based on the studentâs current major. 21 e. A review of relevant internship, volunteer, and 22 employment opportunities related to the studentâs areas 23 of interest or major as well as relevant graduate-level 24 educational opportunities. 25 f. A review of available resources regarding building and 26 updating a resume, seeking professional recommendations for 27 employment, drafting cover letters, and submitting writing 28 samples. 29 2. The office or unit shall encourage the student to 30 continue to utilize the resources of the office or unit 31 following the meeting. 32 3. A student is not required to attend a meeting under 33 this section if the student attended such a meeting at another 34 institution of higher education. 35 -1- LSB 5116XC (4) 91 je/ns 1/ 3 S.F. _____ Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261M.3 Written materials. 1 Before or during a meeting required by section 261M.2, the 2 institutionâs career development office or similar unit of the 3 institution shall provide the student with all of the following 4 information in writing: 5 1. Information on how to connect with persons working in 6 fields of study or industries of interest to the student or 7 related to the studentâs declared major. 8 2. Information regarding the number of related jobs that 9 were available in fields of study or industries of interest to 10 the student or related to the studentâs declared major for the 11 prior year as well as the prior five years. 12 3. Information regarding average compensation and the pay 13 range of jobs identified in subsection 2. 14 4. Information that identifies the highest paying 15 occupations or careers in Iowa during the prior year as well 16 as the prior five years. 17 5. Information that identifies the highest demand 18 occupations or careers in Iowa during the prior year as well 19 as the prior five years. 20 6. Information that identifies the highest paying 21 occupations or careers in Iowa during the prior year as well as 22 the prior five years that were also in the highest demand. 23 7. Information that identifies the highest demand 24 occupations or careers in Iowa that had the highest 25 compensation and that do not require a bachelorâs degree during 26 the prior year as well as the prior five years. 27 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to undergraduate 28 students enrolling in an institution of higher education, as 29 defined in section 261M.1, as enacted by this Act, for the 30 first time on or after the effective date of this Act. 31